Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “public employee” and  “public employer” have
the meanings given those terms under ORS 243.650.
(2) When a public  employee receives an erroneous overpayment of wages in an amount
greater than the employee’s entitlement, the public employer may deduct the  amount of the
overpayment from wages earned by the public employee provided that:
(a) The deduction  is for an overpayment that occurred during the 364-day period imme-
diately preceding the date on which the public employer provides to the public  employee the
written statements described under paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
(b) The public employer provides the following to the public employee  at least 10 calendar
days before making the deduction:
(A) A written statement itemizing the  overpayment amount and purpose of each de-
duction;
(B) A written statement that provides that in no event  may the total amount of a de-
duction exceed five percent of the public  employee’s gross pay each pay period, unless the
public employee otherwise requests and specifies that a greater percentage or amount be
deducted; and
(C) A written statement informing the public employee that,  if the public employee is
terminated or otherwise separates from employment, the public employer  can recoup the
balance owed from the public employee’s final paycheck.
SECTION 2.
ORS 292.063 is repealed.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Bureau of Labor and Industries by section 1, chapter , Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5015), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  is increased by $114,461
for paycheck overpayment wage claims made by public employees.
Enrolled Senate Bill 968 (SB 968-B) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 968 (SB 968-B) Page 2